Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.647

Supervision by director—Credit union request for review.

During the period of supervisory direction, the credit union may request the director to review an action taken or proposed to be taken by the representative, specifying how the action is not in the best interests of the credit union. The request stays the action, pending the director's review of the request.

[ 1997 c 397 s 63.]